Wyoming, session 2025, SF0185.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-101(a) by creating new
paragraphs (xviii) through (xxiii) and by renumbering
(xviii) as (xxiv) and 39-11-105(a)(i)(intro), (ii)(intro),
(iv) and (v)(intro) are amended to read:

39-11-101. Definitions.
SF0185

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0767

(a) As used in this act unless otherwise specifically
provided:

(xviii) "Governmental purpose" means that a
majority of the property is used for health, safety and
welfare, education, transportation, infrastructure or
administrative purposes of a governmental entity.
"Governmental purpose" shall not include property owned by
a governmental entity acting in its proprietary capacity by
conducting activities that are frequently carried on
through private enterprises and shall not include any of
the following:

(A) Property used for recreation including
cabin rentals, campgrounds, bowling alleys, movie theatres,
shooting ranges and sports complexes;

(B) Property that is leased or possessed by
a non-governmental entity including airplane hangars leased
for private use, property leased for commercial operations,
housing for employees regardless of whether a fee is
charged, land leased for agricultural or other use, land
SF0185

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0767
under privately owned structures, medical clinics operated
by a private entity and school buildings that are no longer
used for governmental purposes;

(C) Idle government property including
vacant land and vacant structures, unless the entity is
required to hold the property by law;

(D) Government property that is held for
sale or lease including business parks and other economic
development properties.

(xix) "Administrative use" means property used
for the administration of the government including, without
limitation, the state capitol, courthouses, city hall
buildings and government office buildings;

(xx) "Education" includes property used for
public schools, colleges and universities including,
without limitation, school buildings, administrative
buildings, bus barns, arts facilities and libraries;

SF0185

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0767
(xxi) "Health, safety and welfare" includes,
without limitation, property used for one (1) or more of
the following purposes:

(A) Health, including state, city or county
health departments;

(B) Military and military base facilities;

(C) Civil or criminal justice;

(D) Law enforcement;

(E) Fire protection;

(F) Hospitals;

(G) Animal control;

(H) Sewer or water systems;

(J) Garbage collection or disposal;

SF0185

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0767
(K) Community event centers including civic
centers and recreation centers;

(M) Fair buildings and fairgrounds;

(N) Correctional facilities;

(O) Veterans care facilities.

(xxii) "Infrastructure" includes, without
limitation, property used for parks, public grounds,
alleys, sidewalks, cemeteries, golf courses, auditoriums
and parking lots;

(xxiii) "Transportation" includes, without
limitation, roads, streets, highways, interstates, aviation
facilities, public buses, rights-of-way that are dedicated
to the public and construction, maintenance, operation and
repair facilities;

(xviii)(xxiv) "This act" means W.S. 39-11-101
through 39-23-111.

SF0185

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0767
39-11-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:

(i) Property owned by the United States the
majority of which is used primarily for a governmental
purpose. The following property is not owned and used
primarily for a governmental purpose:

(ii) Property of the state of Wyoming owned and
used primarily for a governmental purpose. The following
property is not owned and used primarily for a governmental
purpose:

(iv) Property of a Wyoming school district owned
and used primarily for a governmental purpose; excluding
teacherages;

(v) Property of Wyoming cities and towns owned
and used primarily for a governmental purpose. including:

SF0185

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0767
Section 2. W.S. 39-11-105(a)(i)(A) through (E),
(ii)(A) through (D) and (v)(A) through (F) is repealed.

Section 3.

(a) Not later than January 1, 2027, any public entity
that has held property that has not been used for a
governmental purpose as defined in W.S.
39-11-101(a)(xviii), as amended by section 1 of this act,
for a period of ten (10) years or more shall make the
property available for sale or shall make a finding showing
good cause for the delay in using the property for a
governmental purpose.

(b) This section shall not apply to property that a
public entity is authorized or required to acquire or hold
by law including state lands, school lands or other lands
managed by the board of land commissioners pursuant to
title 36 of the Wyoming statutes.

(c) As used in this section, "public entity" means
the state of Wyoming and its agencies, municipalities,
SF0185

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0767
counties, school districts, political subdivisions and
special districts.

Section 4. This act is effective January 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0185